Idaho statutes. Title 56 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE AND WELFARE
Chapter 2 PUBLIC ASSISTANCE LAW
§ 56-255. Medical assistance program — Services to be provided.

The department may make payments for the following services furnished by providers to participants who are determined to be eligible on the dates on which the services were provided. Any service under this section shall be reimbursed only when medically necessary within the appropriations provided by law and in accordance with federal law and regulation, Idaho law and department rule. Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, medical assistance includes the following benefits specific to the eligibility categories established in section 56-254(1), (2) and (3), Idaho Code, as well as a list of benefits to which all Idaho medicaid participants are entitled, defined in subsection (5) of this section.

Specific health benefits and limitations for low-income children and working-age adults with no special health needs include:

All services described in subsection (5) of this section;

Early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment services for individuals under age twenty-one (21) years, and treatment of conditions found; and

Cost-sharing required of participants. Participants in the low-income children and working-age adult group are subject to the following premium payments, as stated in department rules:

Participants with family incomes equal to or less than one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty guideline are not required to pay premiums; and

Participants with family incomes above one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty guideline will be required to pay premiums in accordance with department rule.

Specific health benefits for persons with disabilities or special health needs include:

All services described in subsection (5) of this section;

Early and periodic screening, diagnosis and treatment services for individuals under age twenty-one (21) years, and treatment of conditions found;

Case management services as defined in accordance with section 1905(a)(19) or section 1915(g) of the social security act; and

Long-term care services, including:

Nursing facility services, other than services in an institution for mental diseases, subject to participant cost-sharing;

Home-based and community-based services, subject to federal approval, provided to individuals who require nursing facility level of care who, without home-based and community-based services, would require institutionalization. These services will include community supports, including options for self-determination or family-directed, which will enable individuals to have greater freedom to manage their own care within the determined budget as defined by department rule; and

Personal care services in a participant’s home, prescribed in accordance with a plan of treatment and provided by a qualified person under supervision of a registered nurse;
(e) Services for persons with developmental disabilities, including:

Intermediate care facility services, other than such services in an institution for mental diseases, for persons determined in accordance with section 1902(a)(31) of the social security act to be in need of such care, including such services in a public institution, or distinct part thereof, for persons with intellectual disabilities or persons with related conditions;

Home-based and community-based services, subject to federal approval, provided to individuals who require an intermediate care facility for people with intellectual disabilities (ICF/ID) level of care who, without home-based and community-based services, would require institutionalization. These services will include community supports and options for self-directed or family-directed services, which will enable individuals to have greater freedom to manage their own care within the determined budget as defined by department rule. The department shall allow budget modifications only when needed to obtain or maintain employment or when health and safety issues are identified and meet the criteria as defined in department rule; and

Developmental disability services for children and adults shall be available based on need through state plan services or waiver services as described in department rule. The department shall develop a blended rate covering both individual and group developmental therapy services;

Intermittent or part-time nursing services provided by a home health agency or by a registered nurse when no home health agency exists in the area;

Home health aide services provided by a home health agency; and

Physical therapy, occupational therapy or speech pathology and audiology services provided by a home health agency or medical rehabilitation facility;

Specialized medical equipment and supplies;

Medicare cost-sharing, including:

Medicare cost-sharing for qualified medicare beneficiaries described in section 1905(p) of the social security act;

Medicare part A premiums for qualified disabled and working individuals described in section 1902(a)(10)(E)(ii) of the social security act;

Medicare part B premiums for specified low-income medicare beneficiaries described in section 1902(a)(10)(E)(iii) of the social security act; and

Medicare part B premiums for qualifying individuals described in section 1902(a)(10)(E)(iv) and subject to section 1933 of the social security act; and

Services provided by a physician or other licensed practitioner to prevent disease, disability and other health conditions or their progressions, to prolong life, or to promote physical or mental health; and

Hospital care, including:

Laboratory and x-ray services;

Prescribed drugs;

Family planning services and supplies for individuals of child-bearing age;

Certified pediatric or family nurse practitioners’ services;

Emergency medical transportation;

Behavioral health services, including:

Inpatient hospital services other than those services provided in an institution for mental diseases;

Outpatient hospital services; and

Emergency hospital services;

Medical supplies, equipment, and appliances suitable for use in the home;

Physical therapy and speech therapies combined to align with the annual medicare caps; and

Occupational therapy to align with the annual medicare cap;

Nonemergency medical transportation.

Specific health benefits for persons over twenty-one (21) years of age who have medicare and medicaid coverage include:

All services described in subsection (5) of this section, other than if provided under the federal medicare program;

All services described in subsection (3) of this section, other than if provided under the federal medicare program;

Other services that supplement medicare coverage; and

Nonemergency medical transportation.

Benefits for all medicaid participants, unless specifically limited in subsection (2), (3) or (4) of this section, include the following:

Health care coverage including, but not limited to, basic inpatient and outpatient medical services, and including:
(i) Physicians’ services, whether furnished in the office, the patient’s home, a hospital, a nursing facility or elsewhere;

Primary care medical homes;

Dental services and medical and surgical services furnished by a dentist in accordance with section 1905(a)(5)(B) of the social security act;

Medical care and any other type of remedial care recognized under Idaho law, furnished by licensed practitioners within the scope of their practice as defined by Idaho law, including:

Services for individuals with speech, hearing and language disorders as defined in department rule;

Eyeglasses prescribed by a physician skilled in diseases of the eye or by an optometrist;

Services provided by essential providers, including:

The family medicine residency of Idaho and the Idaho state university family medicine residency; and

(f) Home health services, including:

(g) Hospice care in accordance with section 1905(o) of the social security act;

Outpatient behavioral health services that are appropriate, delivered by providers that meet national accreditation standards and may include community-based rehabilitation services and case management; and

Inpatient psychiatric facility services whether in a hospital, or for persons under the age of twenty-two (22) years in a freestanding psychiatric facility as permitted by federal law;

Podiatrists’ services based on chronic care criteria as defined in department rule;

Optometrists’ services based on chronic care criteria as defined in department rule;

Chiropractors’ services, limited to six (6) visits per year; and

Other practitioners’ services, in accordance with department rules;

Rural health clinic services and other ambulatory services furnished by a rural health clinic in accordance with section 1905(l)(1) of the social security act;

Federally qualified health center (FQHC) services and other ambulatory services that are covered under the plan and furnished by an FQHC in accordance with section 1905(l)(2) of the social security act;
(iii) Indian health services;

District health departments; and

(h) Physician, hospital or other services deemed experimental are excluded from coverage. The director may allow coverage of procedures or services deemed investigational if the procedures or services are as cost-effective as traditional, standard treatments.

§ 56-256. Preventive health assistance.

The department of health and welfare may establish preventive health assistance benefits available to a medicaid participant in order to provide incentives to promote healthy behavior and responsible use of health care services.

Preventive health assistance benefits are available when the participant complies with recommended preventive care and demonstrates healthy behaviors or conducts other activities as specified in department rule. Preventive health assistance benefits are only available during a participant’s period of eligibility.

The uses of preventive health assistance may include, but not be limited to, participant payments for preventive health products and services and participant cost-sharing payments as specified in department rule.

Preventive health assistance benefits may be used to cover delinquent cost-sharing obligations when participants have complied with recommended preventive care as described in department rule.

§ 56-257. Copayments.

Within the limits of federal medicaid law and regulations, the department of health and welfare shall establish enforceable cost sharing in order to increase the awareness and responsibility of medicaid participants for the cost of their health care and to encourage use of cost-effective care in the most appropriate setting. Copayments established by department rule may include, but not be limited to, the following:

Medicaid services including, but not limited to, chiropractic visits, podiatrist visits, optometrist visits, physical therapy visits, occupational therapy visits, speech therapy visits, outpatient hospital visits and physician office visits;

Inappropriate use of emergency medicaid reimbursed services, including hospital emergency room and emergency transportation; and

Missed appointments with health care providers when it is the practice of the health care provider to charge such copayments to all of their patients regardless of payer.

The director may exempt, subject to federal approval, any group of medicaid participants from the cost-sharing provisions in this section.

§ 56-258, 56-259. [Reserved.]

Sections 56-260 through 56-266, Idaho Code, shall be known and may be cited as the “Medicaid Cost Containment and Health Care Improvement Act.”

§ 56-261. Legislative findings and intent.

The legislature finds that the current health care delivery system of payment to medicaid health care providers on a fee for service basis does not provide the appropriate incentives and can be improved by incorporating managed care tools, including capitation and selective contracting, with the objective of moving toward an accountable care system that results in improved health outcomes.

The legislature intends that the provisions of sections 56-260 through 56-266, Idaho Code, result in the improved health of public assistance recipients while, at the same time, increasing the choices and responsibilities of those recipients. The legislature further intends that these sections result in improved business practices of providers.

The legislature directs the department to pursue opportunities in the medicaid program that result in safe and appropriate discharge from public and private institutions including nursing homes, intermediate care facilities and psychiatric facilities into community settings and that such results should be financially sustainable.

Price increases should be implemented only through specific appropriation authority unless the adjustments are specified in federal law.

§ 56-262. Definitions.

The definitions contained in section 56-252, Idaho Code, shall apply to sections 56-260 through 56-266, Idaho Code.

§ 56-263. Medicaid managed care plan.

The department shall present to the legislature on the first day of the second session of the sixty-first Idaho legislature a plan for medicaid managed care with focus on high-cost populations including, but not limited to:

Dual eligibles; and

High-risk pregnancies.

The medicaid managed care plan shall include, but not be limited to, the following elements:

Improved coordination of care through primary care medical homes.

Approaches that improve coordination and provide case management for high-risk, high-cost disabled adults and children that reduce costs and improve health outcomes, including mandatory enrollment in special needs plans, and that consider other managed care approaches.

Managed care contracts to pay for behavioral health benefits as described in executive order number 2011-01 and in any implementing legislation. At a minimum, the system should include independent, standardized, statewide assessment and evidence-based benefits provided by businesses that meet national accreditation standards.

The elimination of duplicative practices that result in unnecessary utilization and costs.

Contracts based on gain sharing, risk-sharing or a capitated basis.

Medical home development with focus on populations with chronic disease using a tiered case management fee.

The department shall seek federal approval or a waiver to require that a medicaid participant who has a medical home as required in section 56-255(5)(b), Idaho Code, and who seeks family planning services or supplies from a provider outside the participant’s medical home, must have a referral to such outside provider. The provisions of this subsection shall apply to medicaid participants upon such approval or the granting of such a waiver.

§ 56-264. Rulemaking authority.

In addition to the rulemaking authority granted to the department in this chapter and elsewhere in Idaho Code regarding the medicaid program and notwithstanding any other Idaho law to the contrary, the department shall have the authority to promulgate rules regarding:

Medical services to:

Change the primary case management paid to providers to a tiered payment based on the health needs of the populations that are managed. A lower payment is to be made for healthier populations and a higher payment is to be made for individuals with special needs, disabilities or are otherwise at risk. An incentive payment is to be provided to practices that provide extended hours beyond the normal business hours that help reduce unnecessary higher-cost emergency care;

Provide that a healthy connections referral is no longer required for urgent care as an alternative to higher cost but unnecessary emergency services; and

Eliminate payment for collateral contact;

Mental health services to:

Eliminate administrative requirements for a functional and intake assessment and add a comprehensive diagnostic assessment addendum;

Restrict duplicative skill training from being provided by a mental health provider when the individual has chosen to receive skill training from a developmental disability provider. Mental health providers may not provide training for skills included in the individual’s developmental disability plan, but may provide services related to the individual’s mental illness that require specialized expertise of mental health professionals, such as management of mental health symptoms, teaching coping skills related to mental health diagnosis, assisting with psychiatric medical appointments and educating individuals about their diagnosis and treatment;

Increase the criteria for accessing the partial care benefit and restrict to those individuals who have a diagnosis of serious and persistent mental illness;

Eliminate the requirement for new annual plans; and

Direct the department to develop an effective management tool for psychosocial rehabilitation services;

In-home care services to:

Eliminate personal care service coordination; and

Restrict duplicative nursing services from a home health agency when nursing services are being provided through the aged and disabled waiver;

Vision services to:

Align coverage requirements for contact lenses with commercial insurers and other state medicaid programs; and

Limit coverage for adults based on chronic care criteria;

Audiology services to eliminate audiology benefits for adults;

Developmental disability services to:

Eliminate payment for collateral contact;

Eliminate supportive counseling benefit;

Reduce annual assessment hours from twelve (12) to four (4) hours and exclude psychological and neuropsychological testing services within these limits;

Reduce plan development payment from twelve (12) to six (6) hours and reduce requirements related to adult developmental disabilities plan development;

Restrict duplicative skill training from being provided by a developmental disabilities provider when an individual has chosen to receive skill training from his mental health provider. The individual may receive skill development services from a developmental disability provider only for skills that are not addressed by the mental health service provider’s plan and that relate directly to the individual’s developmental disability, such as skills related to activities of daily living and functional independence;

Implement changes to certified family homes pursuant to chapter 35, title 39, Idaho Code, to:

Create approval criteria and process for approving new certified family homes;

Recertify current certified family homes; and

Develop applicant and licensing fees to cover certifying and recertifying costs; and

Institutional care services to discharge individuals from institutional settings where such services are no longer necessary.

§ 56-265. Provider payment.

Where there is an equivalent, the payment to medicaid providers:

May be up to but shall not exceed one hundred percent (100%) of the current medicare rate for primary care procedure codes as defined by the centers for medicare and medicaid services; and

Shall be ninety percent (90%) of the current medicare rate for all other procedure codes.

Where there is no medicare equivalent, the payment rate to medicaid providers shall be prescribed by rule.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, if the services are provided by a private, freestanding mental health hospital facility that is an institution for mental disease as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(i), the department shall reimburse for inpatient services at a rate not to exceed ninety-one percent (91%) of the current medicare rate within federally allowed reimbursement under the medicaid program. The reimbursement provided for in this subsection shall be effective until July 1, 2021.

The department shall, through the annual budget process, include a line-item request for adjustments to provider rates. All changes to provider payment rates shall be subject to approval of the legislature by appropriation.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter, the department may enter into agreements with providers to pay for services based on their value in terms of measurable health care quality and positive impacts to participant health.

Any such agreement shall be designed to be cost-neutral or cost-saving compared to other payment methodologies.

The department is authorized to pursue waiver agreements with the federal government as needed to support value-based payment arrangements, up to and including fully capitated provider-based managed care.

Medicaid reimbursement for critical access, out-of-state, and state-owned hospitals shall be as follows:

In-state, critical access hospitals as designated according to 42 U.S.C. 1395i-4(c)(2)(B) shall be reimbursed at one hundred one percent (101%) of cost;

Out-of-state hospitals shall be reimbursed at eighty-seven percent (87%) of cost;

State-owned hospitals shall be reimbursed at one hundred percent (100%) of cost; and

Out-of-state hospital institutions for mental disease as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(i) shall be reimbursed at a per diem equivalent to ninety-five percent (95%) of cost.

The department shall equitably reduce net reimbursements for all hospital services, including in-state institutions for mental disease but excluding all hospitals and institutions described in subsection (6) of this section, by amounts targeted to reduce general fund needs for hospital payments by three million one hundred thousand dollars ($3,100,000) in state fiscal year 2020 and eight million seven hundred twenty thousand dollars ($8,720,000) in state fiscal year 2021.

The department shall work with all Idaho hospitals, including institutions for mental disease as defined in 42 U.S.C. 1396d(i), to establish value-based payment methods for inpatient and outpatient hospital services to replace existing cost-based reimbursement methods for in-state hospitals, other than those hospitals and institutions described in subsection (6) of this section, effective July 1, 2021. Budgets for hospital payments shall be subject to prospective legislative approval.
(9) The department shall work with Idaho hospitals to establish a quality payment program for inpatient and outpatient adjustment payments described in section 56-1406, Idaho Code. Inpatient and outpatient adjustment payments shall be subject to increase or reduction based on hospital service quality measures established by the department in consultation with Idaho hospitals.

§ 56-266. Authorization to obtain federal approval.

The department is authorized to obtain federal approval for the requirements set forth in sections 56-260 through 56-266, Idaho Code.

§ 56-267. Medicaid eligibility expansion.

Notwithstanding any provision of law or federal waiver to the contrary, the state shall amend its state plan to expand medicaid eligibility to include those persons under sixty-five (65) years of age whose modified adjusted gross income is one hundred thirty-three percent (133%) of the federal poverty level or below and who are not otherwise eligible for any other coverage under the state plan, in accordance with sections 1902(a)(10)(A)(i)(VIII) and 1902(e)(14) of the social security act.

No later than ninety (90) days after approval of this act, the department shall submit any necessary state plan amendments to the United States department of health and human services, centers for medicare and medicaid services to implement the provisions of this section. The department is required and authorized to take all actions necessary to implement the provisions of this section as soon as practicable.

Eligibility for medicaid as described in this section shall not be delayed if the centers for medicare and medicaid services fail to approve any waivers of the state plan for which the department applies, nor shall such eligibility be delayed while the department is considering or negotiating any waivers to the state plan. The department shall not implement any waiver that would result in a reduction in federal financial participation for persons identified in subsection (1) of this section below the ninety percent (90%) commitment described in section 1905(y) of the social security act.

If section 1905(y) of the social security act is held unlawful or unconstitutional by the United States supreme court, then the legislature shall declare this section to be null, void, and of no force and effect.

If federal financial participation for persons identified in subsection (1) of this section is reduced below the ninety percent (90%) commitment described in section 1905(y) of the social security act, then the senate and house of representatives health and welfare committees shall, as soon as practicable, review the effects of such reduction and make a recommendation to the legislature as to whether medicaid eligibility expansion should remain in effect. The review and recommendation described in this subsection shall be conducted by the date of adjournment of the regular legislative session following the date of reduction in federal financial participation.

The department:

Shall place all persons participating in medicaid pursuant to this section in a care management program authorized under section 56-265(5), Idaho Code, or in another managed care program to improve the quality of their care, to the extent possible; and

Is authorized to seek any federal approval necessary to implement the provisions of this subsection.

No later than January 31 in the 2023 legislative session, the senate and house of representatives health and welfare committees shall review all fiscal, health, and other impacts of medicaid eligibility expansion pursuant to this section and shall make a recommendation to the legislature as to whether such expansion should remain in effect.

§ 56-250. Short title.

§ 56-260. Short title.